West Virginia, session 2026, HB4022.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-102. Staffing Allocation for Child Protective Services Workers. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, the commissioner shall allocate and station Child Protective Services workers by county based on population, referrals, and average caseload. The county population shall be based on the United States Census. The commissioner may adjust the allocation and station of Child Protective Services workers among counties as necessary based on immediate needs of each county, as demonstrated by the present referrals and caseloads. (b) The bureau shall report the allocation to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability annually by July 1. The report shall include, but is not limited to:(1) Information regarding each allocation change that occurred in the 12 months immediately preceding July 1 and persisted for more than three weeks; and(2) A brief explanation justifying each allocation change. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home